North Dakota, session 69, HB1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-10-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-10-03.1. Class B authorized emergency vehicles.
1. The driver of a class B authorized emergency vehicle may:
a. Park or stand, irrespective of the provisions of this chapter.
b. Exceed the speed limit so long as the driver does not endanger life or property during the
time of a local or national disaster.
c. Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified directions.
2. The exceptions granted in this section to a class B authorized emergency vehicle apply only
when the authorized emergency vehicle is displaying an amber and white light visible under
normal atmospheric conditions for a distance of five hundred feet [152.4 meters] in any
direction, and:
a. When it is necessary for the authorized emergency vehicle to use these exemptions for
the immediate protection of life or property;
b. When an authorized emergency vehicle is stopped on a highway for the purpose of
performing a duty as required of the driver; or
c. When traveling at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.
3. A class B authorized emergency vehicle may display a flashing blue light when the vehicle is
stopped on a highway. A class B authorized emergency vehicle may not display a flashing
blue light when transporting another vehicle or when traveling on a highway.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 39-21-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-21-26. Special restrictions on lamps.
1. Any lighted lamp or illuminating device uponon a motor vehicle, other than headlamps, spot
lamps, auxiliary lamps, flashing turn signals, emergency vehicle warning lamps and schoolbus
warning lamps, which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than three hundred
candlepower must be so directed so that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will
strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than
seventy-five feet [22.86 meters] from the vehicle.
2. NoA person may not drive or move any vehicle or equipment uponon any highway with anya
lamp or device thereon displaying a red or green light visible from directly in front of the center

H. B. NO. 1241 - PAGE 2
thereofof the vehicle or equipment. This section does not apply to anya vehicle upon which a
red light visible from the front is expressly authorized or required by this chapter.
3. Flashing lights are prohibited except on an authorized:
a. An authorized emergency vehicle, schoolbus, snow-removal equipment;
b. A schoolbus;
c. Snow - removal equipment ;
d. A vehicle owned by a funeral home, which may display a flashing purple light only while
used for the purpose of escorting a funeral procession; or on any
e. Any vehicle as a means of indicating a right or left turn, or the presence of a vehicular
traffic hazard requiring unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing.

H. B. NO. 1241 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1241.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State